Florida, session 2026, SB748.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraphs (c) and (d) are added to subsection 13 (1) of section 921.0024, Florida Statutes, to read: 14 921.0024âCriminal Punishment Code; worksheet computations; 15 scoresheets.â 16 (1) 17 (c)âNOTICE CONCERNING VOTING RIGHTS: 18 Article VI, s. 4(a) and (b) of the Florida Constitution 19 provide the following concerning voting rights: 20 SECTION 4.âDisqualifications.â 21 (a)âNo person convicted of a felony, or adjudicated in this 22 or any other state to be mentally incompetent, shall be 23 qualified to vote or hold office until restoration of civil 24 rights or removal of disability. Except as provided in 25 subsection (b) of this section, any disqualification from voting 26 arising from a felony conviction shall terminate and voting 27 rights shall be restored upon completion of all terms of 28 sentence including parole or probation. 29 (b)âNo person convicted of murder or a felony sexual 30 offense shall be qualified to vote until restoration of civil 31 rights. 32 33 Section 98.0751 of the Florida Statutes provides the 34 following concerning restoration of voting rights: 35 98.0751âRestoration of voting rights; termination of 36 ineligibility subsequent to a felony conviction.â 37 (1)âA person who has been disqualified from voting based on 38 a felony conviction for an offense other than murder or a felony 39 sexual offense must have such disqualification terminated and 40 his or her voting rights restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of 41 the State Constitution upon the completion of all terms of his 42 or her sentence, including parole or probation. The voting 43 disqualification does not terminate unless a personâs civil 44 rights are restored pursuant to s. 8, Art. IV of the State 45 Constitution if the disqualification arises from a felony 46 conviction of murder or a felony sexual offense, or if the 47 person has not completed all terms of sentence, as specified in 48 subsection (2). 49 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 50 (a)ââCompletion of all terms of sentenceâ means any portion 51 of a sentence that is contained in the four corners of the 52 sentencing document, including, but not limited to: 53 1.âRelease from any term of imprisonment ordered by the 54 court as a part of the sentence; 55 2.âTermination from any term of probation or community 56 control ordered by the court as a part of the sentence; 57 3.âFulfillment of any term ordered by the court as a part 58 of the sentence; 59 4.âTermination from any term of any supervision, which is 60 monitored by the Florida Commission on Offender Review, 61 including, but not limited to, parole; and 62 5.a.âFull payment of restitution ordered to a victim by the 63 court as a part of the sentence. A victim includes, but is not 64 limited to, a person or persons, the estate or estates thereof, 65 an entity, the state, or the Federal Government. 66 b.âFull payment of fines or fees ordered by the court as a 67 part of the sentence or that are ordered by the court as a 68 condition of any form of supervision, including, but not limited 69 to, probation, community control, or parole. 70 c.âThe financial obligations required under sub 71 subparagraph a. or sub-subparagraph b. include only the amount 72 specifically ordered by the court as part of the sentence and do 73 not include any fines, fees, or costs that accrue after the date 74 the obligation is ordered as a part of the sentence. 75 d.âFor the limited purpose of addressing a plea for relief 76 pursuant to sub-subparagraph e. and notwithstanding any other 77 statute, rule, or provision of law, a court may not be 78 prohibited from modifying the financial obligations of an 79 original sentence required under sub-subparagraph a. or sub 80 subparagraph b. Such modification shall not infringe on a 81 defendantâs or a victimâs rights provided in the United States 82 Constitution or the State Constitution. 83 e.âFinancial obligations required under sub-subparagraph a. 84 or sub-subparagraph b. are considered completed in the following 85 manner or in any combination thereof: 86 (I)âActual payment of the obligation in full. 87 (II)âUpon the payeeâs approval, either through appearance 88 in open court or through the production of a notarized consent 89 by the payee, the termination by the court of any financial 90 obligation to a payee, including, but not limited to, a victim, 91 or the court. 92 (III)âCompletion of all community service hours, if the 93 court, unless otherwise prohibited by law or the State 94 Constitution, converts the financial obligation to community 95 service. 96 97 A term required to be completed in accordance with this 98 paragraph shall be deemed completed if the court modifies the 99 original sentencing order to no longer require completion of 100 such term. The requirement to pay any financial obligation 101 specified in this paragraph is not deemed completed upon 102 conversion to a civil lien. 103 (b)ââFelony sexual offenseâ means any of the following: 104 1.âAny felony offense that serves as a predicate to 105 registration as a sexual offender in accordance with s. 106 943.0435; 107 2.âSection 491.0112 [sexual misconduct by a 108 psychotherapist]; 109 3.âSection 784.049(3)(b) or (4) [sexual cyberharassment by 110 a person with a prior sexual cyberharassment conviction or 111 sexual cyberharassment when committed for the purpose of 112 pecuniary or any other financial gain]; 113 4.âSection 794.08 [female genital mutilation]; 114 5.âSection 796.08 [criminal transmission of HIV]; 115 6.âSection 800.101 [offenses against students by authority 116 figures]; 117 7.âSection 826.04 [incest]; 118 8.âSection 847.012 [sale or distribution of material 119 harmful to minors or using minors in production]; 120 9.âSection 872.06(2) [abuse of a dead body]; 121 10.âSection 944.35(3)(b)2. [sexual abuse of a prisoner]; 122 11.âSection 951.221(1) [sexual misconduct between detention 123 facility employees and inmates]; or 124 12.âAny similar offense committed in another jurisdiction 125 which would be an offense listed in this paragraph if it had 126 been committed in violation of the laws of this state. 127 (c)ââMurderâ means either of the following: 128 1.âA violation of any of the following sections which 129 results in the actual killing of a human being: 130 a.âSection 775.33(4) [terrorism resulting in death]. 131 b.âSection 782.04(1), (2), or (3) [murder]. 132 c.âSection 782.09 [killing of unborn child by injury to 133 mother]. 134 2.âAny similar offense committed in another jurisdiction 135 which would be an offense listed in this paragraph if it had 136 been committed in violation of the laws of this state. 137 (3)(a)âThe department shall obtain and review information 138 pursuant to s. 98.075(5) related to a person who registers to 139 vote and make an initial determination on whether such 140 information is credible and reliable regarding whether the 141 person is eligible pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of the State 142 Constitution and this section. Upon making an initial 143 determination of the credibility and reliability of such 144 information, the department [of State] shall forward such 145 information to the supervisor of elections pursuant to s. 146 98.075. 147 (b)âA local supervisor of elections shall verify and make a 148 final determination pursuant to s. 98.075 regarding whether the 149 person who registers to vote is eligible pursuant to s. 4, Art. 150 VI of the State Constitution and this section. 151 (c)âThe supervisor of elections may request additional 152 assistance from the department [of State] in making the final 153 determination, if necessary. 154 (4)âFor the purpose of determining a voter registrantâs 155 eligibility, the provisions of this section shall be strictly 156 construed. If a provision is susceptible to differing 157 interpretations, it shall be construed in favor of the 158 registrant. 159 160 (d)âIn order for a defendant to receive notice of the 161 impact of his or her sentence on voter eligibility, each 162 defendant must receive a copy of the scoresheet containing the 163 notice in paragraph (c) before a sentence is imposed. 164 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.